Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.150

Business and professions account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5294-S.SL) ***

(1) The business and professions account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses, registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following chapters must be deposited into the account:

(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;

(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;

(c) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;

(d) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;

(e) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;

(f) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;

(g) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;

(h) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;

(i) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;

(j) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;

(k) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;

(l) Chapter 42.45 RCW, notaries public;

(m) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares;

(n) Chapter 67.08 RCW, boxing, martial arts, and wrestling;

(o) Chapter 18.300 RCW, body art, body piercing, and tattooing;

(p) Chapter 79A.60 RCW, whitewater river outfitters;

(q) Chapter 19.158 RCW, commercial telephone solicitation; and

(r) Chapter 19.290 RCW, scrap metal businesses.

Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the department. Any residue in the account must be accumulated and may not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the legislature may transfer to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

(2) The director must biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which must include the estimated income from these business and professions fees.

[ 2017 c 281 s 40; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 978; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 977; 2013 c 322 s 30; 2011 c 298 s 25. Prior: 2009 c 429 s 4; 2009 c 412 s 21; 2009 c 370 s 19; 2008 c 119 s 22; 2005 c 25 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 c 281: See RCW 42.45.905.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective date—2009 c 412 ss 1-21: See RCW 18.300.901.

Short title—Implementation—2009 c 412: See RCW 18.300.900 and 18.300.902.

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 17 and 19: See note following RCW 18.96.210.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Effective date—2005 c 25: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2005." [ 2005 c 25 s 5.]